Hawaii statutes.
§287-25 Owner's policy requirements.
An owner's policy of liability insurance:

(1) Shall designate by explicit description or by
appropriate reference all motor vehicles with respect to which coverage is
thereby to be granted;

(2) Shall insure the person named therein and any
other person, as insured, using any such motor vehicle or motor vehicles with
the express or implied permission of the named insured, against loss from the
liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance,
or use of the motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the State and such other
places as the policy provides, subject to limits exclusive of interest and
costs, with respect to each such motor vehicle, as follows: $10,000 because of
bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, and subject to
such limit for one person, $20,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two
or more persons in any one accident, and $5,000 because of injury to or
destruction of property of others in any one accident. [L 1949, c 393, pt of
§1; RL 1955, §160-103; am L 1963, c 98, §1; HRS §287-25]

Cross References

Policy coverage: motorcycles and motor scooters, see
§431:10G-301; motor vehicles (no-fault law), see §431:10C-301.

Case Notes

Initial permission rule, discussed. 901 F.2d 765.

Insurance omnibus clause protects insured, uninsured
permittee-driver, and injured. 50 H. 212, 437 P.2d 99.

Requirement as to coverage of persons using with permission,
construed. 50 H. 212, 437 P.2d 99.

Where terms of insurance policy are in conflict with statute,
latter takes precedence. 50 H. 212, 437 P.2d 99.

Omnibus clause coverage is limited by §287-24 to certified
policies. 52 H. 80, 470 P.2d 521.

Defendant was not a permissive user of insured vehicle and
was therefore not a "covered person" under insurance contract. 78 H.
249, 891 P.2d 1041.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next